Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.320

Adverse change in contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract—Appeal from—Notice—Service—Filing—Contents.

Any teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other certificated employee, desiring to appeal from any action or failure to act upon the part of a school board relating to the discharge or other action adversely affecting his or her contract status, or failure to renew that employee's contract for the next ensuing term, within thirty days after his or her receipt of such decision or order, may serve upon the chair of the school board and file with the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the school district is located a notice of appeal which shall set forth also in a clear and concise manner the errors complained of.

[ 1990 c 33 s 397; 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 14; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.460. Prior: 1961 c 241 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.460, 28.58.460.]